Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 11.2 Qualifications of Teacher Assistants

16-11.2-1.
“Teacher assistant” defined.

The term “teacher assistant” as used in this chapter is deemed to include any person employed to provide instructional or other direct services to students (and/or their parents/legal guardian) under the supervision and direction of the classroom teacher or other appropriately-certified professional staff. The department of elementary and secondary education shall coordinate the development of program standards for a training program for teacher assistants. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and make program standards available.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 96, § 1.

16-11.2-2.
General qualifications of teacher assistants.

No person shall be employed as a teacher assistant in any school supported in whole or in part by public funds unless he or she shall:

Be of good character as verified by the employer;

Hold a high school diploma or general equivalency diploma;

For any person hired after January 1, 1999, complete a training program in compliance with the teacher assistant program standards developed by the department of elementary and secondary education pursuant to §

16-11.2-1

. The training program shall not be required of those persons employed as a teacher assistant in another Rhode Island school district prior to January 1, 1999, those who hold certification as a teacher assistant in another state, or those who hold an associate’s or bachelor’s degree and have completed coursework or other training consistent with the teacher assistant program standards developed by the department of elementary and secondary education;

If hired after January 8, 2002, and providing an instructional service, have completed at least two (2) years of study at an institution of higher education, obtained an associate’s (or higher) degree; or otherwise met a rigorous standard of quality and can demonstrate through a formal state or local academic assessment an appropriate level of: (i) knowledge of, and the ability to assist in instructing, reading, writing, and mathematics; or (ii) knowledge of, and the ability to assist in instructing, reading readiness, writing readiness, and mathematics readiness, as appropriate. Assessments developed at the local level may consist of performance assessments documenting teacher assistant skills; and

If hired on or before January 8, 2002, and providing instructional service, meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (4) herein not later than January 8, 2006. The employer shall pay for up to two (2) test administration fees for all teacher assistants hired prior to July 1, 2003.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 136, § 1.

16-11.2-3.
Continued professional development of teacher assistants.

As a condition of continued employment every person employed as a teacher assistant shall participate in ongoing professional development.

Each school district or institution employing teacher assistants shall maintain records on a teacher assistant’s completion of:

Training for the work assignment;

Continuing education and relevant coursework;

For any person hired after January 1, 1999, a certificate of completion from a training program which complied with the teaching assistant training program standards developed by the department of elementary and secondary education pursuant to §

16-11.2-1

; and/or

The requirements set forth in §

16-11.2-2(4)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 136, § 1.

16-11.2-4.
Prior experience.

Any person employed as a teacher assistant on August 5, 1996 shall not be required to meet the requirement set forth in §

16-11.2-2(2)

and (3), but shall meet all other requirements imposed by this section no later than August 5, 1996.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 96, § 1.

16-11.2-5.
Standardized testing.

Except as provided in §

16-11.2-2

, no person shall be deemed not qualified to be a teacher assistant under this chapter solely because of his or her score on any standardized teacher assistant’s examination. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require standardized testing for noninstructional teaching assistant positions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 126, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 136, § 2.

16-11.2-6.
Teacher assistant substitutes.

Any teacher assistant hired after July 1, 2002 who substitutes as a teacher assistant for more than twenty (20) days during any school year shall be required to meet the general qualifications of teacher assistant as provided in §

16-11.2-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 235, § 1.